Washington statutes.
RCW 41.32.330

Credit for professional preparation subsequent to becoming teacher.

The department may allow credit for professional preparation to a member for attendance at institutions of higher learning, or for a scholarship or grant under an established foundation, subsequent to becoming a public school teacher; but not more than two years of such credit may be granted to any member.

[ 1991 c 35 s 44; 1969 ex.s. c 150 s 10; 1955 c 274 s 14; 1947 c 80 s 33; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 4995-52.]

NOTES:

Intent—1991 c 35: See note following RCW 41.26.005.

Effective date—1969 ex.s. c 150: See note following RCW 41.50.200.